Wisconsin, session 2025, SB966.
do enact as follows:SB966,13Section 1. 30.18 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:SB966,2,10430.18 (8) Department may raise water elevations. If after examination 1and investigation the department determines that it is necessary to raise water 2elevations in any navigable stream or lake for conservation purposes, the 3department may, if funds are available from any source other than license fees and 4subject to the requirement under s. 31.16, determine and establish the elevations to 5which the water may be raised or maintained, but the water elevation may not be 6established below the normal elevation. If any lands are damaged by raising the 7water levels above normal and the department cannot acquire the right to flow the 8lands by agreement with the owner, the department may, subject to the 9requirement under s. 31.16, acquire the lands or the right to flow the lands by 10condemnation under ch. 32.SB966,211Section 2. 31.02 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB966,2,231231.02 (1) The department, in the interest of public rights in navigable waters, 13to promote safety, and to protect life, health, property, property values, and 14economic values may, subject to the requirement under s. 31.16, regulate and 15control the level and flow of water in all navigable waters and may erect, or may 16order and require bench marks to be erected, upon which shall be designated the 17maximum level of water that may be impounded and the lowest level of water that 18may be maintained by any dam heretofore or hereafter constructed and maintained 19and which will affect the level and flow of navigable waters; and may by order fix a 20level for any body of navigable water below which the same shall not be lowered 21except as provided in this chapter; and shall establish and maintain gauging 22stations upon the various navigable waters of the state and shall take other steps 23necessary to determine and record the characteristics of such waters.SB966,324Section 3. 31.16 of the statutes is created to read:SB966,3,7131.16 Projects involving water diversion. Except in the case of an 2emergency, the department may not initiate, authorize, or issue a permit for a 3project located in a town that involves the use of stationary or portable pumps or 4other mechanisms that divert water to locations where water is not naturally 5occurring or that raise the water elevation of a body of water above what is naturally 6occurring unless the town board of the town in which the activity will occur 7approves the project by resolution.SB966,48Section 4. 87.02 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB966,3,14987.02 (1) To order the straightening, widening, altering, deepening, changing 10or the removing of obstructions from the course of any river, watercourse, pond, 11lake, creek, or natural stream, ditch, drain, or sewer, and the concentration, 12diversion, or division of the flow of water therein; provided, that in the case of 13navigable waters no such work shall substantially impair the navigability thereof 14and that any such project located in a town is subject to s. 31.16.SB966,3,1515